Idaho statutes. Title 47 MINES AND MINING
Chapter 15
MINED LAND RECLAMATION

Sec.

§ 47-1501. Purpose of chapter.

It is the purpose of this chapter to provide for the protection of the public health, safety and welfare through measures to reclaim the surface of all the lands within the state disturbed by exploration and surface and underground mining operations and measures to assure the proper closure of cyanidation facilities and thereby conserve natural resources, aid in the protection of wildlife, domestic animals, and aquatic resources, and reduce soil erosion.

§ 47-1502. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Idaho mined land reclamation act.” The reclamation provisions of this act shall not apply to mining operations regulated by the Idaho dredge and placer mining protection act, nor shall such provisions apply to any workings at an underground mine below the surface.

§ 47-1503. Definitions.

Wherever used or referred to in this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Board” means the state board of land commissioners or such department, commission, or agency as may lawfully succeed to the powers and duties of such board.

“Cyanidation” means the method of extracting target precious metals from ores by treatment with cyanide solution, which is the primary leaching agent for the extraction.

“Cyanidation facility” means that portion of a new ore processing facility, or a material modification or a material expansion of that portion of an existing ore processing facility, that utilizes cyanidation and is intended to contain, treat, or dispose of cyanide-containing materials including spent ore, tailings, and process water.

“Director” means the head of the department of lands or such officer as may lawfully succeed to the powers and duties of said director.

“Affected land” means the land area included in overburden disposal areas, mined areas, mineral stockpiles, roads, tailings ponds and other areas disturbed on the surface of mining operations.

“Mineral” means coal, clay, stone, sand, gravel, metalliferous and nonmetalliferous type of ores, and any other similar solid material or substance of commercial value to be excavated from natural deposits on or in the earth.

“Mining operations” means the activities performed on the surface of a surface or underground mine in the extraction of minerals from the ground, including the excavating of pits, removal of minerals, disposal of overburden, and the construction of haulage roads, exclusive of exploration operations, except that any exploration operations which, exclusive of exploration roads, (a) result during a period of twelve (12) consecutive months in more than five (5) contiguous acres of newly affected land, or (b) which, exclusive of exploration roads, result during a period of twelve (12) consecutive months in newly affected land consisting of more than ten (10) noncontiguous acres, if such affected land constitutes more than fifteen percent (15%) of the total area of any circular tract that includes such affected land, shall be deemed to be a surface mining operation for the purposes of this chapter.

“Exploration operations” means activities performed on the surface of lands to locate mineral bodies and to determine the mineability and merchantability thereof.

“Surface mine” means an area where minerals are extracted by removing the overburden lying above and adjacent to natural deposits thereof and mining directly from the natural deposits thereby exposed.

“Underground mine” means an area where minerals are extracted from beneath the surface of the ground by means of an adit, shaft, tunnel, decline, portal, bore hole, drill hole for solution mining, or such other means of access beneath the surface of the ground, other than a pit.

“Mined area” means surface of land from which overburden, waste rock, or minerals have been removed other than by drilling of exploration drill holes.

“Overburden” or “waste rock” means material extracted by an operator that is not a part of the material ultimately removed from a surface mine or underground mine and marketed by an operator, exclusive of mineral stockpiles.

“Overburden disposal area” means land surface upon which overburden or waste rock is placed or planned to be placed.

“Exploration drill holes” means holes drilled from the surface to locate mineral bodies and to determine the mineability and merchantability thereof.

“Exploration roads” means roads constructed to locate mineral bodies and to determine the mineability and merchantability thereof.

“Exploration trenches” means trenches constructed to locate mineral bodies and to determine the mineability and merchantability thereof.

“Peak” means a projecting point of overburden.

“Significant change” means, for an underground mine, a fifty percent (50%) increase in the areal extent of the disturbed affected land.

“Mine panel” means that portion of a mine designated by an operator as a panel of a surface mine or the surface effects of an underground mine on the map submitted pursuant to section 47-1506, Idaho Code.

“Mineral stockpile” means minerals extracted during surface mining operations and retained at the surface mine for future rather than immediate use.

“Permanent closure plan” means a description of the procedures, methods, and schedule that will be implemented to meet the intent and purposes of this chapter in treating and disposing of cyanide-containing materials including spent ore, tailings, and process water and in controlling and monitoring discharges and potential discharges for a reasonable period of time based on site-specific conditions.

“Pit” means an excavation created by the extraction of minerals or overburden at a surface mine.

“Ridge” means a lengthened elevation of overburden.

“Road” means a way constructed on a surface mine for the passage of vehicles, including the bed, slopes and shoulders thereof.

“Operator” means any person or persons, any partnership, limited partnership, corporation, or limited liability company, or any association of persons, either natural or artificial, including, but not limited to, every public or governmental agency engaged in mining operations or exploration operations or in operating a cyanidation facility, whether individually, jointly, or through subsidiaries, agents, employees, or contractors, and shall mean every governmental agency owning or controlling the use of any surface mine when the mineral extracted is to be used by or for the benefit of such agency. It shall not include any such governmental agency with respect to those mining or exploration operations as to which it grants mineral leases or prospecting permits or similar contracts, but nothing herein shall relieve the operator acting pursuant to a mineral lease, prospecting permit or similar contract from the terms of this chapter.

“Hearing officer” means that person selected by the board to hear proceedings under section 47-1513, Idaho Code.

“Final order of the board” means a written notice of rejection, the order of a hearing officer at the conclusion of a hearing, or any other order of the board where additional administrative remedies are not available.

“Tailings pond” means an area on the surface of a mining operation enclosed by a man-made or natural dam onto which has been discharged the waste material resulting from the primary concentration of minerals in ore excavated from a surface or underground mine.

“Financial assurance” means monetary assurances in such form and amount as are necessary for the board or a third party to perform the reclamation activities required in this chapter.
(30) “Post-closure” means a description of the procedures, methods, and schedule for monitoring, care and maintenance, and water management that will be implemented on a mine panel after cessation of mining operations for a period not to exceed thirty (30) years unless the board determines a longer period is necessary.

§ 47-1504. Board of land commissioners — Responsibility.

The state board of land commissioners is charged with the responsibility of administering this act in accordance with the purpose of the act and the intent of the legislature. The director of the department of lands shall, upon authorization of the board, exercise the powers and discharge the duties vested in the board by this act.

§ 47-1505. Duties and powers of board.

In addition to the other duties and powers of the board prescribed by law, the board is granted and shall be entitled to exercise the following authority and powers and perform the following duties:

To administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and the rules and orders promulgated thereunder as provided in this chapter.

To conduct and promote the coordination and acceleration of research, studies, surveys, experiments, demonstrations and training in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. In carrying out the activities authorized by this section, the board may enter into contracts with and make grants to institutions, agencies, organizations and individuals and shall collect and make available any information obtained therefrom.

To adopt and promulgate reasonable rules respecting the administration of this chapter and such rules as may be necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter, provided that no rules shall be adopted that require reclamation activities in addition to those set forth in this chapter. All such rules shall be adopted in accordance with and subject to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

To enter upon affected lands at all reasonable times, for the purpose of inspection, to determine whether the provisions of this chapter have been complied with. Such inspections shall be conducted in the presence of the operator or his duly authorized employees or representatives, and the operator shall make such persons available for the purpose of inspections.

To reclaim affected land with respect to which financial assurance has been forfeited and, in the board’s discretion, with the permission of the landowner, to reclaim such other land that becomes affected land.

To complete closure activities with respect to a cyanidation facility for which a permanent closure financial assurance has been forfeited.

Upon receipt of a reclamation plan or permanent closure plan or amended or supplemental plan required by this chapter, the director shall notify the cities and counties in which the mining operation or cyanidation facility is proposed. The notice shall include the name and address of the operator and shall describe the procedure and the schedule by which the plan may be approved or denied. This notification requirement shall not apply to exploration operations.
(7)(a) Upon receipt of a reclamation plan or permanent closure plan or amended or supplemental plan required by this chapter, the director shall notify the cities and counties in which the mining operation or cyanidation facility is proposed. The notice shall include the name and address of the operator and shall describe the procedure and the schedule by which the plan may be approved or denied. This notification requirement shall not apply to exploration operations.

Cities and counties may review the nonconfidential portions of the plan at the department’s office and may provide comments to the director concerning the plan. Nothing in this section shall extend the time limit for the board to deliver to the operator a notice of rejection or approval of the plan or affect the confidentiality provisions of section 47-1515, Idaho Code.

No city or county shall enact or adopt any ordinance, rule or resolution to regulate exploration or mining operations or a permanent closure plan in this state that conflicts with any provision of this chapter or the rules promulgated thereunder. This subpart shall not affect the planning and zoning authorities available to cities and counties pursuant to chapter 65, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 47-1506. Operator — Duties prior to operation — Submission of maps and plans.

Any operator desiring to conduct mining operations within the state of Idaho for the purpose of immediate or ultimate sale of the minerals in either the natural or processed state shall submit to the board prior to commencing such mining operations a reclamation plan that contains the following:

A map of the mine panel on which said operator desires to conduct mining operations, which sets forth with respect to said panel the following:

The location of existing roads and anticipated access and main haulage roads planned to be constructed in conducting the mining operations.

The approximate boundaries of the lands to be utilized in the process of mining operations.

The approximate location and, if known, the names of all streams, creeks, or bodies of water within the area where mining operations shall take place.

The name and address of the person to whom notices, orders, and other information required to be given to the operator pursuant to this chapter may be sent.

The drainage adjacent to the area where the surface is being utilized by mining operations.

The approximate boundaries of the lands that will become affected lands as a result of mining operations during the year immediately following the date that a reclamation plan is approved as to said panel, together with the number of acres included within said boundaries.

A description of foreseeable water quality impacts from mining operations and proposed water management activities to comply with water quality requirements.

A description of post-closure activities.

Diagrams showing the planned location of pits, mineral stockpiles, overburden piles and tailings ponds on said panel.

A description of the action which said operator intends to take to comply with the provisions of this chapter as to the mining operations conducted on such mine panel.

Any operator who is not required to submit an operating plan for a mining operation to an entity of the federal government shall submit to the board, as part of the reclamation plan, an operating plan with regards to that mining operation. The operating plan shall include:
(b)(1) Any operator who is not required to submit an operating plan for a mining operation to an entity of the federal government shall submit to the board, as part of the reclamation plan, an operating plan with regards to that mining operation. The operating plan shall include:

Maps showing the location of existing roads and anticipated access and main haulage roads planned to be constructed for mining operations.

The boundaries and acreage of the lands to be utilized in the process of mining operations.

Maps showing the planned location of pits, mineral stockpiles, overburden piles and tailings ponds for the mining operations.

The location and, if known, the names of all streams, creeks, or bodies of water within the area where mining operations shall take place.

The drainage adjacent to the area where the surface is being utilized by mining operations.
(vi) The approximate boundaries and acreage of the lands that will become affected during the first year of construction of mining operations.

The board shall promulgate rules or guidelines to allow the content of a nonfederal operating plan to be determined based upon the type and size of the mining operation.

No operator who is required to submit an operating plan for a mining operation to an entity of the federal government shall be required to submit an operating plan to the board. This provision shall apply to all lands, regardless of surface or mineral ownership, covered by the operating plan submitted to the entity of the federal government.

No operator shall commence mining operations on any mine panel without first having a reclamation plan approved by the state board of land commissioners.

Any operator desiring to conduct exploration operations within the state of Idaho using motorized earth-moving equipment in order to locate minerals for immediate or ultimate sale in either the natural or the processed state shall notify the board in writing prior to or as soon after beginning exploration operations as possible and in any event within seven (7) days after beginning exploration operations. The notice shall include the following:

The name and address of the operator;

The location of the operation and the starting date and estimated completion date;

The anticipated size of the operation, and the general method of operation.

Any operator desiring to operate a cyanidation facility within the state of Idaho shall submit to the board prior to the operation of such a facility a permanent closure plan that contains the following:

The name and address of the operator;

The location of the operation;

The objectives, methods and procedures the operator will use to attain permanent closure;

An estimate of the cost of attaining permanent closure as well as an estimate of the costs to achieve critical phases of the closure plan;

Any other information specified in the rules adopted to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter; and

An operator may incorporate a description of post-closure activities in a permanent closure plan in lieu of inclusion in a reclamation plan.

The board may require a reasonable fee for reviewing and approving a permanent closure plan or reclamation plan. The fee may include the reasonable cost to employ a qualified independent party, acceptable to the operator and the board, to verify the accuracy of the cost estimate required in subsection (f)(4) of this section and section 47-1512(c), Idaho Code.

The board shall coordinate its review of activities in a reclamation plan, operating plan, and permanent closure plan under statutory responsibility of the department of environmental quality with that department, but that coordination shall not extend the time limit in which the board must act on a plan submitted.

No operator shall commence operation of a cyanidation facility without first having a permanent closure plan approved by the board.

The notice shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

§ 47-1507. Plan — Approval or rejection by board — Hearing.

Upon determination by the board that a reclamation or permanent closure plan or any amended plan submitted by an operator meets the requirements of this chapter, the board shall deliver to the operator, in writing, a notice of approval of such plan, and thereafter said plan shall govern and determine the nature and extent of the obligations of the operator for compliance with this chapter, with respect to the mine panel or cyanidation facility for which the plan was submitted.

If the board determines that a reclamation or permanent closure plan or amended plan fails to fulfill the requirements of this chapter, it shall deliver to the operator, in writing, a notice of rejection of the plan and shall set forth in said notice of rejection the reasons for such rejection, the factual findings upon which such rejection is based, the manner in which the plan fails to fulfill said requirements, and the requirements necessary to comply with this chapter. Upon receipt of said notice of rejection, said operator may submit amended plans. Upon further determination by the board that the amended plan still does not fulfill the requirements of said section, it shall deliver to the operator, in writing, a notice of rejection of the amended plan in the same form as set out in this section.

Weather permitting, the board shall deliver to the operator within sixty (60) days after the receipt of any reclamation plan or amended reclamation plan, or within one hundred eighty (180) days after the receipt of any permanent closure plan or amended permanent closure plan, the notice of rejection or notice of approval of said plan, as the case may be, provided, however, that if the board fails to deliver a notice of approval or notice of rejection within said time period, the plan submitted shall be deemed to comply with this chapter, and the operator may commence and conduct his mining operations on the mine panel or operate the cyanidation facility covered by such plan as if a notice of approval of said plan had been received from the board; provided, however, that if weather conditions prevent the board from inspecting the mine panel or cyanidation facility to obtain information needed to approve or reject a submitted plan, it may, in writing to the operator, extend the time not to exceed thirty (30) days after weather conditions permit such inspection.

For the purpose of determining whether a proposed plan or amended or supplemental plan complies with the requirements of this chapter, the board may, in its discretion, call for a public hearing. The hearing shall be held under such rules as promulgated by the board. Any interested person may appear at the hearing and give testimony. At the discretion of the board, the director may conduct the hearing and transmit a summary thereof to the board. Any hearing held shall not extend the period of time limit in which the board must act on a plan submitted.

§ 47-1508. Amended plan — Supplemental plan — Submission.

In the event that a material change in circumstances arises that the operator, or the board, believes requires a change in an approved plan, including any amended plan, then the operator shall submit to the board a supplemental plan setting forth the proposed changes and the board shall likewise set forth its proposed changes and state the reasons therefor. Upon determination by the board that a supplemental plan or any amended supplemental plan submitted by the operator meets the requirements of this chapter, it shall deliver to the operator, in writing, a notice of approval of said supplemental plan, and thereafter said supplemental plan shall govern and determine the nature and extent of the obligations of the operator for compliance with respect to the mine panel or cyanidation facility for which the plan was submitted.

If the board determines that a supplemental plan fails to fulfill the requirements of this chapter, it shall deliver to the operator, in writing, a notice of rejection of the supplemental plan and shall set forth in said notice of rejection the manner in which said plan fails to fulfill said requirements and shall stipulate the corrective requirements necessary to comply with said sections. Upon receipt of said notice of rejection, the operator may submit amended supplemental plans. Upon further determination by the board that an amended supplemental plan does not fulfill the requirements of said sections, it shall deliver to the operator, in writing, a notice of rejection of amended supplemental plan and shall set forth in said notice of rejection the manner in which such amended supplemental plan fails to fulfill said requirements and shall stipulate the requirements necessary to comply with said sections.

The board shall, weather permitting, deliver to the operator within sixty (60) days after the receipt of any supplemental reclamation plan or amended supplemental reclamation plan, or within one hundred eighty (180) days after the receipt of any supplemental permanent closure plan or amended supplemental permanent closure plan, the notice of rejection, setting forth in detail the reasons for such rejection and the factual findings upon which such rejection is based or notice of approval of said plan, as the case may be, provided, however, that if the board fails to deliver a notice of approval or notice of rejection within said time period, the plan submitted shall be deemed to comply with this chapter and the operator may commence and conduct or continue, as the case may be, his mining operations or operate the cyanidation facility as if a notice of approval of said plan had been received from the board. If weather conditions prevent the board from inspecting the mine panel or cyanidation facility to obtain information needed to approve or reject a submitted plan, it may, in writing to the operator, extend the time not to exceed thirty (30) days after weather conditions permit such inspection.

If an operator determines that unforeseen events or unexpected conditions require immediate changes in or additions to an approved reclamation or permanent closure plan, the operator may continue operations in accordance with the procedures dictated by the changed conditions, pending submission and approval of a supplemental plan, even though such operations do not comply with the approved plan, provided, however, that nothing herein stated shall be construed to excuse the operator from complying with the reclamation requirements of sections 47-1509 and 47-1510, Idaho Code, or from the applicable closure requirements of a permit issued under section 39-118A, Idaho Code. Notice of such unforeseen events or unexpected conditions shall be given to the board within ten (10) days after discovery thereof, and a proposed supplemental plan shall be submitted within thirty (30) days after discovery thereof.

At least once every five (5) years, the board shall review reclamation plans and revise if necessary to meet the requirements of sections 47-1506, 47-1509, 47-1510, and 47-1511, Idaho Code, when there is a material change in the reclamation plan. As part of this review, the board shall revise the amount, terms, and conditions of any financial assurance when there is a material change in the reclamation plan or a material change in the estimated reasonable costs of reclamation determined pursuant to section 47-1512, Idaho Code. Any such revision shall apply only to the affected lands covered by the material change.

For a permanent closure plan approved by the board after July 1, 2005, the board shall periodically review, and revise if necessary to meet the requirements of this chapter, the amount, terms, and conditions of any financial assurance when there is a material change in the permanent closure plan or a material change in the estimated reasonable costs of permanent closure determined pursuant to section 47-1512, Idaho Code. The board may require a fee sufficient to employ a qualified independent party, acceptable to the operator and the board, to verify any revised estimate of the reasonable costs of permanent closure.

Amendments and revisions are subject to the fee requirements in section 47-1506(g), Idaho Code.

Any determination by the board under this section shall be considered a final order pursuant to section 47-1514, Idaho Code.

§ 47-1509. Procedures in reclamation.

Except as otherwise provided in this act, every operator who conducts exploration or mining operations that disturb two (2) or more acres within the state of Idaho shall perform the following reclamation activities:

Ridges of overburden shall be leveled in such manner as to have a minimum width of ten (10) feet at the top.

Peaks of overburden shall be leveled in such a manner as to have a minimum width of fifteen (15) feet at the top.

Overburden piles shall be reasonably prepared to control erosion.

Manage water as necessary to meet the requirements authorized under chapter 1, title 39, Idaho Code.

Roads that are abandoned shall be cross-ditched insofar as necessary to avoid erosion gullies.

Exploration drill holes shall be plugged or otherwise left so as to eliminate hazards to humans or animals.

Abandoned affected lands shall be topped to the extent that such overburden is reasonably available from the pit, with that type of overburden conducive to the control of erosion or the growth of the vegetation that the operator elects to plant thereon.

The operator shall conduct revegetation activities on the mined areas, overburden piles, and abandoned roads in accordance with the provisions of this act.

Tailings ponds shall be reasonably prepared in such a condition that they will not constitute a hazard to human or animal life.

Complete all other reclamation required in the approved reclamation plan.

The board may request, in writing, that a given road or portion thereof not be cross-ditched or revegetated and, upon such request, the operator shall be excused from performing such activities as to such road or portion thereof.

Every operator who conducts exploration or mining operations that disturb less than two (2) acres within the state of Idaho shall, wherever possible, contour the lands so disturbed to approximate the previous contour of the lands.

The operator and board may agree, in writing, to do any act with respect to reclamation above and beyond the requirements herein set forth.

§ 47-1510. Vegetation planting.

Except as otherwise provided in this act, an operator shall plant, on affected lands, vegetation species that can be expected to result in vegetation comparable to the vegetation that was growing on the area occupied by the affected lands prior to the exploration and mining operations.

No planting shall be required on any affected lands, or portions thereof, where planting would not be practicable or reasonable because the soil is composed of sand, gravel, shale, stone or other material to such an extent as to prohibit plant growth.

No planting shall be required to be made with respect to any of the following:

On any mined area or overburden pile proposed to be used in the mining operations for haulage roads, as long as such roads are not abandoned.

On any mined area or overburden pile where lakes are formed by rainfall or drainage runoff from the adjoining lands.

On any mineral stockpile.

On any exploration trench that will become a part of any pit or overburden disposal area.

On any road that the operator intends to use in his mining operations, as long as said road has not been abandoned.

§ 47-1511. Reclamation activities — Time limitations.

All reclamation activities required to be conducted under this act shall be performed in a good and workmanlike manner, with all reasonable diligence, and as to a given exploration drill hole, road or trench, within one (1) year after abandonment thereof.

The reclamation activity as to a given mine panel shall be commenced within one (1) year after mining operations have permanently ceased as to such mine panel, provided, however, that in the event that during the course of mining operations on a given mine panel, the operator permanently ceases disposing of overburden on a given overburden pile, or permanently ceases removing minerals from a given pit, or permanently ceases using a given road or other affected land, then the reclamation activities to be conducted hereunder as to such pit, road, overburden pile, or other affected land shall be commenced within one (1) year after such termination, despite the fact that all operations as to the mine panel, which includes such pit, road, overburden pile, or other affected land, have not permanently ceased. It shall be presumed that the operator has permanently ceased mining operations as to a given affected land if no substantial amount of overburden has been placed on the overburden pile in question or if no minerals have been removed from the pit in question, as the case may be, for a period of three (3) years.

This presumption may be rebutted by evidencing, in writing, to the board what mining operations the operator has planned on the pit, road, overburden pile, or other affected land not used within a three (3) year period. Should the board determine that the operator, in good faith, intends to continue the mining operation within a reasonable period of time, it shall, in writing, so notify the operator. Should the board determine that the operation will not be continued within a reasonable period of time, the board shall proceed as though the mining operation has been abandoned.